Maryland, session 2026, HB1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–205.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the State Lakes Protection and Restoration
Fund.
(b) There is a State Lakes Protection and Restoration Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to protect and restore State–owned AND
STATE–MANAGED lakes.
(d) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1207*

HOUSE BILL 1207
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(2) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only for the protection or restoration of State–owned
OR STATE–MANAGED lakes BY:
(1) REMOVING SEDIMENT;
(2) TREATING CONTAMINATED SEDIMENT;
(3) PREVENTING THE SPREAD OF INVASIVE SPECIES;
(4) IMPROVING ECOLOGICAL AND RECREATIONAL VALUE; AND
(5) TAKING ANY OTHER ACTION THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IS
NECESSARY.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for the protection or restoration of
State–owned OR STATE–MANAGED lakes is supplemental to and is not intended to take
the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for the protection or restoration
of State–owned OR STATE–MANAGED lakes.
(K) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2028 AND 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN
THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000 TO THE FUND TO BE
USED SOLELY FOR THE PROTECTION AND RESTORATION OF DEEP CREEK LAKE.

HOUSE BILL 1207 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.